Utah statutes.
17-27a-509.5.   Review for application completeness -- Substantive
application review -- Reasonable diligence required for determination of
whether improvements or warranty work meets standards -- Money damages claim
prohibited.
(1) (a)  Each county shall, in a timely manner, determine whether an
application is complete for the purposes of subsequent, substantive land use
authority review.
(b)  After a reasonable period of time to allow the county diligently to
evaluate whether all objective ordinance-based application criteria have been
met, if application fees have been paid, the applicant may in writing request
that the county provide a written determination either that the application
is:
(i)  complete for the purposes of allowing subsequent, substantive land use
authority review; or
(ii)  deficient with respect to a specific, objective, ordinance-based
application requirement.
(c)  Within 30 days of receipt of an applicant's request under this section,
the county shall either:
(i)  mail a written notice to the applicant advising that the application is
deficient with respect to a specified, objective, ordinance-based criterion,
and stating that the application must be supplemented by specific additional
information identified in the notice; or
(ii)  accept the application as complete for the purposes of further
substantive processing by the land use authority.
(d)  If the notice required by Subsection (1)(c)(i) is not timely mailed, the
application shall be considered complete, for purposes of further substantive
land use authority review.
(e) (i)  The applicant may raise and resolve in a single appeal any
determination made under this Subsection (1) to the appeal authority,
including an allegation that a reasonable period of time has elapsed under
Subsection (1)(a).
(ii)  The appeal authority shall issue a written decision for any appeal
requested under this Subsection (1)(e).
(f) (i)  The applicant may appeal to district court the decision of the appeal
authority made under Subsection (1)(e).
(ii)  Each appeal under Subsection (1)(f)(i) shall be made within 30 days of
the date of the written decision.
(2) (a)  Each land use authority shall substantively review a complete
application and an application considered complete under Subsection (1)(d),
and shall approve or deny each application with reasonable diligence.
(b)  After a reasonable period of time to allow the land use authority to
consider an application, the applicant may in writing request that the land
use authority take final action within 45 days from date of service of the
written request.
(c)  The land use authority shall take final action, approving or denying the
application within 45 days of the written request.
(d)  If the land use authority denies an application processed under the
mandates of Subsection (2)(b), or if the applicant has requested a written
decision in the application, the land use authority shall include its reasons
for denial in writing, on the record, which may include the official minutes
of the meeting in which the decision was rendered.
(e)  If the land use authority fails to comply with Subsection (2)(c), the
applicant may appeal this failure to district court within 30 days of the date
on which the land use authority should have taken final action under
Subsection (2)(c).
(3) (a)  With reasonable diligence, each land use authority shall determine
whether the installation of required subdivision improvements or the
performance of warranty work meets the county's adopted standards.
(b) (i)  An applicant may in writing request the land use authority to accept
or reject the applicant's installation of required subdivision improvements or
performance of warranty work.
(ii)  The land use authority shall accept or reject subdivision improvements
within 15 days after receiving an applicant's written request under Subsection
(3)(b)(i), or as soon as practicable after that 15-day period if inspection of
the subdivision improvements is impeded by winter weather conditions.
(iii)  The land use authority shall accept or reject the performance of
warranty work within 45 days after receiving an applicant's written request
under Subsection (3)(b)(i), or as soon as practicable after that 45-day period
if inspection of the warranty work is impeded by winter weather conditions.
(c)  If a land use authority determines that the installation of required
subdivision improvements or the performance of warranty work does not meet the
county's adopted standards, the land use authority shall comprehensively and
with specificity list the reasons for its determination.
(4)  Subject to Section 17-27a-508, nothing in this section and no action or
inaction of the land use authority relieves an applicant's duty to comply with
all applicable substantive ordinances and regulations.
(5)  There shall be no money damages remedy arising from a claim under this
section.
